Hawaii statutes.
§415A-16 Merger and share exchange. A
professional corporation involved in a merger or share exchange shall be
subject to the provisions for mergers and share exchanges set forth in chapter
414. [L 1985, c 259, pt of §1; am L 2002, c 41, §17]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next